Maryland, session 2026, HB0636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
5–514.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, a member
of the General Assembly, a filed candidate for election to the General Assembly, or a
member–elect of the General Assembly may not receive earned income from:
(i) an executive unit; or
(ii) a political subdivision of the State.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0636*

HOUSE BILL 636
(2) The Joint Ethics Committee may exempt an individual from the
provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection if the earned income is for:
(i) educational instruction provided by the member, candidate, or
member–elect;
(ii) a position that is subject to a merit system hiring process;
(iii) a human services position; or
(iv) a career promotion, change, or progression that is a logical
transition from a pre–existing relationship as described in paragraph (3)(ii) of this
subsection.
(3) This subsection does not apply to compensation to a member, candidate,
or member–elect derived from:
(i) employment as a nonelected law enforcement officer or a fire or
rescue squad worker; [or]
(ii) a transaction or relationship that existed before the individual:
1. filed a certificate of candidacy for election to the General
Assembly while the individual was not an incumbent member of the General Assembly; or
2. was appointed to fill a vacancy; OR
(III) A TRANSACTION OR RELATIONSHIP:
1. THAT THE INDIVIDUAL ENTERED INTO AFTER HAVING
SERVED AT LEAST ONE FULL ELECTED TERM IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
2. FOR WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL HAS OBJECTIVELY
SATISFIED THE MINIMUM EDUCATION, LICENSURE, AND EXPERIENCE
REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.